Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.430

Information technology investment pool—Information technology projects—Reports.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of financial management may establish an information technology investment pool and may enter into financial contracts for the acquisition of information technology projects for state agencies. Information technology projects funded under this section must meet the following requirements:

(a) The project begins or continues replacement of information technology systems with modern and more efficient information technology systems;

(b) The project improves the ability of an agency to recover from major disaster; or

(c) The project provides future savings and efficiencies for an agency through reduced operating costs, improved customer service, or increased revenue collections.

(2) Preference for project approval under this section must be given to an agency that has prior project approval from Washington technology solutions and an approved business plan, and the primary hurdle to project funding is the lack of funding capacity.

(3) The office of financial management with assistance from Washington technology solutions shall report to the governor and the fiscal committees of the legislature by November 1st of each year on the status of distributions and expenditures on information technology projects and improved statewide or agency performance results achieved by project funding.

[ 2024 c 54 s 52; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 33 s 5.]